Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. First Aid Equipment; Medical Care; Emergency Medical Services Providers.

§ 45.2-909.
First aid equipment.

Every surface coal mine shall have adequate supplies of first aid equipment as determined by the Chief. Such supplies shall be located at strategic locations at the mine site so as to be available in a reasonable response time. Such supplies shall be encased in suitable sanitary receptacles designed to be reasonably dust-tight and moisture proof. In addition to the supplies in the receptacles, blankets, splints, and properly constructed stretchers in good condition shall be provided at every mine. All of the first aid supplies shall be available for use by any person employed at the mine. No first aid supplies shall be removed or diverted without authorization except in case of injury at the mine.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.6; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-101; 1978, c. 94; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.262; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-910.
First aid training.

Each surface foreman shall complete and pass a first aid course of study as prescribed by the Chief. The Chief may utilize the Department’s educational and training facilities in the conduct of such training programs and may require the cooperation of mine operators in making such programs available to their employees.

Each operator of a surface coal mine shall make first aid training, including refresher training, available upon request to every miner employed at such mine.

History.

1977, c. 679, § 45.1-101.2; 1978, c. 94; 1984, c. 590; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.263; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-911.
Attention to injured persons.

Prompt medical attention shall be provided in the event of an injury, and adequate facilities shall be made available for transporting injured persons to a hospital where necessary.

Safe transportation shall be provided to move injured persons from the site where the injury occurred to an area that is accessible to emergency transportation.

The operator of each mine shall post directional signs that are conspicuously located to identify each route of ingress to and egress from any mine located off of a public road.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.6; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-101; 1978, c. 94; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.264; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”